Utah statutes.
70A-8-301.    Delivery.
(1)  Delivery of a certificated security to a purchaser occurs when:
(a)  the purchaser acquires possession of the security certificate;
(b)  another person, other than a securities intermediary, either acquires
possession of the security certificate on behalf of the purchaser or, having
previously acquired possession of the certificate, acknowledges that it holds
for the purchaser; or
(c)  a securities intermediary acting on behalf of the purchaser acquires
possession of the security certificate, only if the certificate is in
registered form and is:
(i)  registered in the name of the purchaser;
(ii)  payable to the order of the purchaser; or
(iii)  specially indorsed to the purchaser by an effective indorsement and has
not been indorsed to the securities intermediary or in blank.
(2)  Delivery of an uncertificated security to a purchaser occurs when:
(a)  the issuer registers the purchaser as the registered owner, upon original
issue or registration of transfer; or
(b)  another person, other than a securities intermediary, either becomes the
registered owner of the uncertificated security on behalf of the purchaser or,
having previously become the registered owner, acknowledges that it holds for
the purchaser.
